North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 1. Purposes; Definitions.

§ 7B-100.
Purpose.

This Subchapter shall be interpreted and construed so as to implement the following purposes and policies:

To provide procedures for the hearing of juvenile cases that assure fairness and equity and that protect the constitutional rights of juveniles and parents;

To develop a disposition in each juvenile case that reflects consideration of the facts, the needs and limitations of the juvenile, and the strengths and weaknesses of the family.

To provide for services for the protection of juveniles by means that respect both the right to family autonomy and the juveniles’ needs for safety, continuity, and permanence; and

To provide standards for the removal, when necessary, of juveniles from their homes and for the return of juveniles to their homes consistent with preventing the unnecessary or inappropriate separation of juveniles from their parents.

To provide standards, consistent with the Adoption and Safe Families Act of 1997, P.L. 105-89, for ensuring that the best interests of the juvenile are of paramount consideration by the court and that when it is not in the juvenile’s best interest to be returned home, the juvenile will be placed in a safe, permanent home within a reasonable amount of time.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2003-140, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to legislation regarding pilot programs for holding family court within district court districts, see the editor’s note under

G.S. 7A-244

.

As to legislation regarding a study of programs for screening for and identification of delinquency risk factors, see the editor’s note under

G.S. 7B-1500

.

As to legislation regarding a study by the Office of Juvenile Justice (now the Division of Juvenile Justice) in cooperation with the Department of Public Instruction to study ways to coordinate case management, provide services to juveniles in need of treatment, and provide public protection, see the editor’s note under

G.S. 7B-1500

.

As to a study by the Office of Juvenile Justice (now the Division of Juvenile Justice) of blended sentencing and direct filing in certain juvenile cases, see the notes to

G.S. 7B-2500

.

As to legislation regarding development of a cost-effective plan to establish statewide community-based dispositional alternatives for juveniles adjudicated delinquent, see the editor’s note under

G.S. 7B-2506

.

As to legislation regarding a phased-in 10-county pilot On Track program as an additional probation option for certain juvenile delinquents, see the editor’s note under

G.S. 7B-2508

.

As to legislation regarding pilot Guard Response Alternative Sentencing Programs as an additional probation option for certain first-time juvenile delinquents, see the editor’s note under

G.S. 7B-2508

.

School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 10.15(a)-(f), provides: “(a) School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative Established.

“(1) Purpose and duties. — There is established the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. The purpose of the Initiative is to identify and coordinate appropriate community services and supports for children at risk of school failure or out-of-home placement in order to address the physical, social, legal, emotional, and developmental factors that affect academic performance. The Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Public Instruction, the State Board of Education, the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and other State agencies that provide services for children shall share responsibility and accountability to improve outcomes for these children and their families. The Initiative shall be based on the following principles:

“a. The development of a strong infrastructure of interagency collaboration.

“b. One child, one team, one plan.

“c. Individualized, strengths-based care.

“d. Accountability.

“e. Cultural competence.

“f. Children at risk of school failure or out-of-home placement may enter the system through any participating agency.

“g. Services shall be specified, delivered, and monitored through a unified Child and Family Plan that is outcome-oriented and evaluation-based.

“h. Services shall be the most efficient in terms of cost and effectiveness and shall be delivered in the most natural settings possible.

“i. Out-of-home placements for children shall be a last resort and shall include concrete plans to bring the children back to a stable permanent home, their schools, and their community.

“j. Families and consumers shall be involved in decision making throughout service planning, delivery, and monitoring.

“(2) Program goals and services. — In order to ensure that children receiving services are appropriately served, the affected State and local agencies shall do the following:

“a. Increase capacity in the school setting to address the academic, health, mental health, social, and legal needs of children.

“b. Ensure that children receiving services are screened initially to identify needs and assessed periodically to determine progress and sustained improvement in educational, health, safety, behavioral, and social outcomes.

“c. Develop uniform screening mechanisms and a set of outcomes that are shared across affected agencies to measure children’s progress in home, school, and community settings.

“d. Promote practices that are known to be effective based upon research or national best practice standards.

“e. Review services provided across affected State agencies to ensure that children’s needs are met.

“f. Eliminate cost-shifting and facilitate cost-sharing among governmental agencies with respect to service development, service delivery, and monitoring for participating children and their families.

“g. Participate in a local memorandum of agreement signed annually by the participating superintendent of the local LEA, directors of the county departments of social services and health, director of the local management entity, the chief district court judge, and the chief district court counselor.

“(3) Local level responsibilities. — In coordination with the North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council (Council), established in subsection (b) of this section, the local board of education shall establish the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative at designated schools and shall appoint the Child and Family Team Leaders, who shall be a school nurse and a school social worker. Each local management entity that has any selected schools in its catchment area shall appoint a Care Coordinator, and any department of social services that has a selected school in its catchment area shall appoint a Child and Family Teams Facilitator. The Care Coordinators and Child and Family Team Facilitators shall have as their sole responsibility working with the selected schools in their catchment areas and shall provide training to school-based personnel, as required. The Child and Family Team Leaders shall identify and screen children who are potentially at risk of academic failure or out-of-home placement due to physical, social, legal, emotional, or developmental factors. Based on the screening results, responsibility for developing, convening, and implementing the Child and Family Team Initiative is as follows:

“a. School personnel shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to academic achievement.

“b. The local management entity shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to mental health, substance abuse, or developmental disabilities and who meet the criteria for the target population established by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.

“c. The local department of public health shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are health-related.

“d. Local departments of social services shall take the lead for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to child welfare, abuse, or neglect.

“e. The chief district court counselor shall take the lead for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to juvenile justice issues. A representative from each named or otherwise identified publicly supported children’s agency shall participate as a member of the Team as needed. Team members shall coordinate, monitor, and assure the successful implementation of a unified Child and Family Plan.

“(4) Reporting requirements. — School-Based Child and Family Team Leaders shall provide data to the Council for inclusion in their report to the North Carolina General Assembly. The report shall include the following:

“a. The number of and other demographic information on children screened and assigned to a team and a description of the services needed by and provided to these children.

“b. The number of and information about children assigned to a team who are placed in programs or facilities outside the child’s home or outside the child’s county and the average length of stay in residential treatment.

“c. The amount and source of funds expended to implement the Initiative.

“d. Information on how families and consumers are involved in decision making throughout service planning, delivery, and monitoring.

“e. Other information as required by the Council to evaluate success in local programs and ensure appropriate outcomes.

“f. Recommendations on needed improvements.

“(5) Local advisory committee. — In each county with a participating school, the superintendent of the local LEA shall either identify an existing cross-agency collaborative or council or shall form a new group to serve as a local advisory committee to work with the Initiative. Newly formed committees shall be chaired by the superintendent and one other member of the committee to be elected by the committee. The local advisory committee shall include the directors of the county departments of social services and health; the directors of the local management entity; the chief district court judge; the chief district court counselor; the director of a school-based or school-linked health center, if a center is located within the catchment area of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative; and representatives of other agencies providing services to children, as designated by the Committee. The members of the Committee shall meet as needed to monitor and support the successful implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. The Local Child and Family Team Advisory Committee may designate existing cross-agency collaboratives or councils as working groups or to provide assistance in accomplishing established goals.

“(b) North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council. —

“(1) Leadership Council established; location. — There is established the North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council (Council). The Council shall be located within the Department of Administration for organizational and budgetary purposes.

“(2) Purpose. — The purpose of the Council is to review and advise the Governor in the development of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and to ensure the active participation and collaboration in the Initiative by all State agencies and their local counterparts providing services to children in participating counties in order to increase the academic success of and reduce out-of-home and out-of-county placements of children at risk of academic failure.

“(3) Membership. — The Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall serve as cochairs of the Council. Council membership shall include the Secretary of the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the Chair of the State Board of Education, the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, and other members as appointed by the Governor.

“(4) The Council shall do the following:

“a. Sign an annual memorandum of agreement (MOA) among the named State agencies to define the purposes of the program and to ensure that program goals are accomplished.

“b. Resolve State policy issues, as identified at the local level, which interfere with effective implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

“c. Direct the integration of resources, as needed, to meet goals and ensure that the Initiative promotes the most effective and efficient use of resources and eliminates duplication of effort.

“d. Establish criteria for defining success in local programs and ensure appropriate outcomes.

“e. Develop an evaluation process, based on expected outcomes, to ensure the goals and objectives of this Initiative are achieved.

“f. Review progress made on integrating policies and resources across State agencies, reaching expected outcomes, and accomplishing other goals.

“g. Report semiannually, on January 1 and July 1, on progress made and goals achieved to the Office of the Governor, the Joint Appropriations Committees and Subcommittees on Education, Justice and Public Safety, and Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office. The Council may designate existing cross-agency collaboratives or councils as working groups or to provide assistance in accomplishing established goals.

“(c) Department of Health and Human Services. — The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall ensure that all agencies within the Department collaborate in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(d) Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention. — The Secretary of the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention shall ensure that all agencies within the Department collaborate in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(e) Administrative Office of the Courts. — The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall ensure that the Office collaborates in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and shall provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(f) Department of Public Instruction. — The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall ensure that the Department collaborates in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and shall provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 32.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 32.5 is a severability clause.

§ 7B-101.
Definitions.

As used in this Subchapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following words have the listed meanings:

Abused juveniles. — Any juvenile less than 18 years of age (i) who is found to be a minor victim of human trafficking under

G.S. 14-43.15

or (ii) whose parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker:

Inflicts or allows to be inflicted upon the juvenile a serious physical injury by other than accidental means;

Creates or allows to be created a substantial risk of serious physical injury to the juvenile by other than accidental means;

Uses or allows to be used upon the juvenile cruel or grossly inappropriate procedures or cruel or grossly inappropriate devices to modify behavior;

Commits, permits, or encourages the commission of a violation of the following laws by, with, or upon the juvenile: first-degree forcible rape, as provided in

G.S. 14-27.21

; second-degree forcible rape as provided in

G.S. 14-27.22

; statutory rape of a child by an adult as provided in

G.S. 14-27.23

; first-degree statutory rape as provided in

G.S. 14-27.24

; first-degree forcible sex offense as provided in

G.S. 14-27.26

; second-degree forcible sex offense as provided in

G.S. 14-27.27

; statutory sexual offense with a child by an adult as provided in

G.S. 14-27.28

; first-degree statutory sexual offense as provided in

G.S. 14-27.29

; sexual activity by a substitute parent or custodian as provided in

G.S. 14-27.31

; sexual activity with a student as provided in

G.S. 14-27.32

; unlawful sale, surrender, or purchase of a minor, as provided in

G.S. 14-43.14

; crime against nature, as provided in

G.S. 14-177

; incest, as provided in

G.S. 14-178

; preparation of obscene photographs, slides, or motion pictures of the juvenile, as provided in

G.S. 14-190.5

; employing or permitting the juvenile to assist in a violation of the obscenity laws as provided in

G.S. 14-190.6

; dissemination of obscene material to the juvenile as provided in

G.S. 14-190.7

and

G.S. 14-190.8

; displaying or disseminating material harmful to the juvenile as provided in

G.S. 14-190.14

and

G.S. 14-190.15

; first and second degree sexual exploitation of the juvenile as provided in

G.S. 14-190.16

and

G.S. 14-190.17

; promoting the prostitution of the juvenile as provided in G.S. 14-205.3(b); and taking indecent liberties with the juvenile, as provided in

G.S. 14-202.1

;

Creates or allows to be created serious emotional damage to the juvenile; serious emotional damage is evidenced by a juvenile’s severe anxiety, depression, withdrawal, or aggressive behavior toward himself or others;

Encourages, directs, or approves of delinquent acts involving moral turpitude committed by the juvenile; or

Commits or allows to be committed an offense under

G.S. 14-43.11

(human trafficking),

G.S. 14-43.12

(involuntary servitude), or

G.S. 14-43.13

(sexual servitude) against the child.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-136, s. 1, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

Caretaker. — Any person other than a parent, guardian, or custodian who has responsibility for the health and welfare of a juvenile in a residential setting. A person responsible for a juvenile’s health and welfare means a stepparent; foster parent; an adult member of the juvenile’s household; an adult entrusted with the juvenile’s care; a potential adoptive parent during a visit or trial placement with a juvenile in the custody of a department; any person such as a house parent or cottage parent who has primary responsibility for supervising a juvenile’s health and welfare in a residential child care facility or residential educational facility; or any employee or volunteer of a division, institution, or school operated by the Department of Health and Human Services. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impose a legal duty of support under Chapter 50 or Chapter 110 of the General Statutes. The duty imposed upon a caretaker as defined in this subdivision shall be for the purpose of this Subchapter only.

Clerk. — Any clerk of superior court, acting clerk, or assistant or deputy clerk.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-129, s. 1, effective October 1, 2013, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

Court. — The district court division of the General Court of Justice.

Court of competent jurisdiction. — A court having the power and authority of law to act at the time of acting over the subject matter of the cause.

(7a)

Criminal history. — A local, State, or federal criminal history of conviction or pending indictment of a crime, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, involving violence against a person.

Custodian. — The person or agency that has been awarded legal custody of a juvenile by a court.

(8a)

Department. — Each county’s child welfare agency. Unless the context clearly implies otherwise, when used in this Subchapter, “department” or “department of social services” shall refer to the county agency providing child welfare services, regardless of the name of the agency or whether the county has consolidated human services, pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77

and shall include a regional social services department created pursuant to Part 2B of Article 1 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes.

Dependent juvenile. — A juvenile in need of assistance or placement because (i) the juvenile has no parent, guardian, or custodian responsible for the juvenile’s care or supervision or (ii) the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian is unable to provide for the juvenile’s care or supervision and lacks an appropriate alternative child care arrangement.

Director. — The director of the department of social services in the county in which the juvenile resides or is found, or the director’s representative as authorized in

G.S. 108A-14

.

District. — Any district court district as established by

G.S. 7A-133

.

(11a)

Family assessment response. — A response to selected reports of child neglect and dependency as determined by the Director using a family-centered approach that is protection and prevention oriented and that evaluates the strengths and needs of the juvenile’s family, as well as the condition of the juvenile.

(11b)

Investigative assessment response. — A response to reports of child abuse and selected reports of child neglect and dependency as determined by the Director using a formal information gathering process to determine whether a juvenile is abused, neglected, or dependent.

Judge. — Any district court judge.

Judicial district. — Any district court district as established by

G.S. 7A-133

.

Juvenile. — A person who has not reached the person’s eighteenth birthday and is not married, emancipated, or a member of the Armed Forces of the United States.

Neglected juvenile. — Any juvenile less than 18 years of age (i) who is found to be a minor victim of human trafficking under

G.S. 14-43.15

or (ii) whose parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker does any of the following:

Does not provide proper care, supervision, or discipline.

Has abandoned the juvenile.

Has not provided or arranged for the provision of necessary medical or remedial care.

Or whose parent, guardian, or custodian has refused to follow the recommendations of the Juvenile and Family Team made pursuant to Article 27A of this Chapter.

Creates or allows to be created a living environment that is injurious to the juvenile’s welfare.

Has participated or attempted to participate in the unlawful transfer of custody of the juvenile under G.S.14-321.2.

Has placed the juvenile for care or adoption in violation of law.

In determining whether a juvenile is a neglected juvenile, it is relevant whether that juvenile lives in a home where another juvenile has died as a result of suspected abuse or neglect or lives in a home where another juvenile has been subjected to abuse or neglect by an adult who regularly lives in the home.

(15a)

Nonrelative kin. — An individual having a substantial relationship with the juvenile. In the case of a juvenile member of a State-recognized tribe as set forth in G.S. 143B-407(a), nonrelative kin also includes any member of a State-recognized tribe or a member of a federally recognized tribe, whether or not there is a substantial relationship with the juvenile.

Petitioner. — The individual who initiates court action, whether by the filing of a petition or of a motion for review alleging the matter for adjudication.

Prosecutor. — The district attorney or assistant district attorney assigned by the district attorney to juvenile proceedings.

Reasonable efforts. — The diligent use of preventive or reunification services by a department of social services when a juvenile’s remaining at home or returning home is consistent with achieving a safe, permanent home for the juvenile within a reasonable period of time. If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the juvenile is not to be returned home, then reasonable efforts means the diligent and timely use of permanency planning services by a department of social services to develop and implement a permanent plan for the juvenile.

(18a)

Relative. — An individual directly related to the juvenile by blood, marriage, or adoption, including, but not limited to, a grandparent, sibling, aunt, or uncle.

(18b)

Responsible individual. — A parent, guardian, custodian, caretaker, or individual responsible for subjecting a juvenile to human trafficking under

G.S. 14-43.11

, 14-43.12, or 14-43.13, who abuses or seriously neglects a juvenile.

(18c)

Return home or reunification. — Placement of the juvenile in the home of either parent or placement of the juvenile in the home of a guardian or custodian from whose home the child was removed by court order.

Safe home. — A home in which the juvenile is not at substantial risk of physical or emotional abuse or neglect.

(19a)

Serious neglect. — Conduct, behavior, or inaction of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker that evidences a disregard of consequences of such magnitude that the conduct, behavior, or inaction constitutes an unequivocal danger to the juvenile’s health, welfare, or safety, but does not constitute abuse.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-129, s. 1, effective October 1, 2013, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

Substantial evidence. — Relevant evidence a reasonable mind would accept as adequate to support a conclusion.

Working day. — Any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday when the courthouse is closed for transactions.The singular includes the plural, the masculine singular includes the feminine singular and masculine and feminine plural unless otherwise specified.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 336; c. 359, s. 2; c. 469, ss. 1-3; c. 716, s. 1; 1985, c. 648; c. 757, s. 156(q); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 852, s. 16; 1987, c. 162; c. 695; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, ss. 36, 37; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 815, s. 1; 1991, c. 258, s. 3; c. 273, s. 11; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 3; 1993, c. 324, s. 1; c. 516, ss. 1-3; 1997-113, s. 1; 1997-390, s. 3; 1997-390, s. 3.2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-506, s. 30; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, ss. 1, 18; 1999-190, s. 1; 1999-318, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-55, s. 1; 2005-399, s. 1; 2009-38, s. 1; 2010-90, ss. 1, 2; 2011-183, s. 2; 2012-153, s. 2; 2013-129, s. 1; 2013-368, s. 16; 2015-123, s. 1; 2015-136, s. 1; 2015-181, s. 21; 2016-94, s. 12C.1(d); 2016-115, s. 3; 2017-41, s. 4.3; 2018-68, s. 8.1(a), (b); 2018-75, s. 5(a); 2018-145, s. 11(d); 2019-33, s. 1; 2019-245, s. 6(a); 2021-100, s. 1(a); 2021-123, s. 5(a); 2021-132, s. 1(a).

Cross References.

As to support for adoptive families at risk of dissolution, see

G.S. 48-1-110

.